Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0619.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 25. "License" means any driving privileges, physical operator's or chauffeur's license, mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, temporary instruction permit, commercial learner's permit, or temporary license issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the licensing of persons individuals to operate motor vehicles. Sec. 30d. "Mobile operator's or chauffeur's license" means a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license issued under section 310a. Sec. 307. (1) If an applicant for an operator's license or chauffeur's license to operate a noncommercial motor vehicle is a citizen of the United States, the applicant shall supply a photographic identity document, a birth certificate, or other sufficient documents as the secretary of state may require, to verify the identity and citizenship of the applicant. If an applicant for an operator's or chauffeur's license is not a citizen of the United States, the applicant shall supply a photographic identity document and other sufficient documents to verify the identity of the applicant and the applicant's legal presence in the United States under subdivision (b). The documents required under this subsection must include the applicant's full legal name, date of birth, and address and residency and demonstrate that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or is legally present in the United States. If the applicant's full legal name differs from the name of the applicant that appears on a document presented under this subsection, the applicant shall present documents to verify the applicant's current full legal name. The secretary of state shall accept as 1 of the required identification documents an identification card issued by the department of corrections to prisoners who are placed on parole or released from a correctional facility, containing the prisoner's legal name, photograph, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 other information identifying the prisoner as provided in section 37(4) of the corrections code of 1953, 1953 PA 232, MCL 791.237. An application for an operator's or chauffeur's license must be made in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state and must contain all of the following: (a) The applicant's full legal name, date of birth, residence address, height, sex, eye color, signature, intent to make an anatomical gift, other information required or permitted on the license under this chapter, and, only to the extent required to comply with federal law, the applicant's Social Security number. The applicant may provide a mailing address if the applicant receives mail at an address different from the applicant's residence address. (b) If the applicant is not a citizen of the United States, the applicant shall provide, and the department shall verify, documents demonstrating the applicant's legal presence in the United States. Nothing in this act must obligate or be construed to obligate this state to comply with title II of the real REAL ID act Act of 2005, Public Law 109-13. The secretary of state may adopt rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, as are necessary for the administration of this subdivision. A determination by the secretary of state that an applicant is not legally present in the United States may be appealed under section 631 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.631. The secretary of state shall not issue an operator's license or a chauffeur's license to an applicant described in this subdivision for a term that exceeds the duration of the applicant's legal presence in the United States. (c) The following notice must be included to inform the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 applicant that under sections 509o and 509r of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.509o and 168.509r, the secretary of state is required to use the residence address provided on this application as the applicant's residence address on the qualified voter file for voter registration and voting: "NOTICE: Michigan law requires that the same address be used for voter registration and driver license purposes. Therefore, if the residence address you provide in this application differs from your voter registration address as it appears on the qualified voter file, the secretary of state will automatically change your voter registration to match the residence address on this application, after which your voter registration at your former address will no longer be valid for voting purposes. A new voter registration card, containing the information of your polling place, will be provided to you by the clerk of the jurisdiction where your residence address is located.". (d) For an original or renewal operator's or chauffeur's license with a vehicle group designation or indorsement, endorsement, the names of all states where the applicant has been licensed to drive any type of motor vehicle during the previous 10 years. (e) For an operator's or chauffeur's license with a vehicle group designation or indorsement, endorsement, the following certifications by the applicant: (i) The applicant meets the applicable federal driver qualification requirements under 49 CFR parts 383 and 391 or meets the applicable qualifications of the department of state police under the motor carrier safety act of 1963, 1963 PA 181, MCL 480.11 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to 480.25. (ii) The vehicle in which the applicant will take the driving skills tests is representative of the type of vehicle the applicant operates or intends to operate. (iii) The applicant is not subject to disqualification by the United States Secretary of Transportation, or a suspension, revocation, or cancellation under any state law for conviction of an offense described in section 312f or 319b. (iv) The applicant does not have a driver's driver license from more than 1 state or jurisdiction. (f) An applicant for an operator's or chauffeur's license with a vehicle group designation and a hazardous material indorsement endorsement shall provide the applicant's fingerprints as prescribed by state and federal law. (g) Only for voter registration transactions under section 493a(6) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.493a, a space for the applicant to indicate on the application or change of address application whether the applicant is a citizen of the United States. (h) Only for voter registration transactions under section 493a(6) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.493a, a space to allow the applicant to indicate that the applicant declines to use the application as a voter registration application. (i) Beginning June 27, 2021, an applicant for an operator's or chauffeur's license who is a program participant in the address confidentiality program under the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.851 to 780.873, shall present to the secretary of state the applicant's participation card issued under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.851 to 780.873. (2) An applicant for an operator's or chauffeur's license may have the applicant's image and signature captured or reproduced when the application for the license is made. The secretary of state shall acquire equipment purchased or leased under this section under standard purchasing procedures of the department of technology, management, and budget based on standards and specifications established by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall not purchase or lease equipment until an appropriation for the equipment has been made by the legislature. A digital photographic image and signature captured under this section must appear on the applicant's operator's license or chauffeur's license. An individual's digital photographic image and signature shall must be used as follows: (a) By a federal, state, or local governmental agency for a law enforcement purpose authorized by law. (b) By the secretary of state for a use specifically authorized by law. (c) By the secretary of state for forwarding to the department of state police the images of individuals required to be registered under the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.721 to 28.730, on the department of state police providing the secretary of state an updated list of the names of those individuals. (d) By the secretary of state for forwarding to the department of state police as provided in section 5c of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.425c. (e) By the secretary of state for forwarding to the department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of licensing and regulatory affairs the images of applicants for an official state registry identification card issued under section 6 of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26426, if the department of licensing and regulatory affairs promulgates rules requiring a photograph as a design element for an official state registry identification card. (f) As necessary to comply with a law of this state or of the United States. (3) An application must contain a signature or verification and certification by the applicant, as determined by the secretary of state, and must be accompanied by the proper fee. The secretary of state shall collect the application fee with the application. The secretary of state shall refund the application fee to the applicant if the license applied for is denied, but shall not refund the fee to an applicant who fails to complete the examination requirements of the secretary of state within 90 days after the date of application for a license. (4) In conjunction with the application for an original or renewal operator's license or chauffeur's license, the secretary of state shall do all of the following: (a) If the applicant is not a participant in the anatomical gift donor registry program, specifically inquire, either orally or in writing, whether the applicant wishes to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry program under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123. If the secretary of state or an employee of the secretary of state fails to inquire whether an applicant wishes to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry program as required by this subdivision, neither the secretary of state nor the employee is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 civilly or criminally liable for the failure to make the inquiry. (b) Provide the applicant with all of the following: (i) Information explaining the applicant's right to make an anatomical gift in the event of death in accordance with section 310. (ii) Information describing the anatomical gift donor registry program under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123. The information required under this subparagraph includes the address and telephone number of Michigan's this state's federally designated organ procurement organization as that term is defined in section 10102 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10102, or its successor organization. (iii) Information giving the applicant the opportunity to be placed on the donor registry described in subparagraph (ii). (c) Provide the applicant with the opportunity to specify on the applicant's operator's or chauffeur's license that the applicant is willing to make an anatomical gift in the event of death in accordance with section 310. (d) Inform the applicant that, if the applicant indicates to the secretary of state under this section a willingness to have the applicant's name placed on the donor registry described in subdivision (b)(ii), the secretary of state will mark the applicant's record for the donor registry. (5) The secretary of state may fulfill the requirements of subsection (4) by 1 or more of the following methods: (a) Providing printed material enclosed with a mailed notice for an operator's or chauffeur's license renewal or the issuance of an operator's or chauffeur's license. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Providing printed material to an applicant who personally appears at a secretary of state branch office, or inquiring orally. (c) Through electronic information transmittals for operator's and chauffeur's licenses processed by electronic means. (6) The secretary of state shall maintain a record of an individual who indicates a willingness to have the individual's name placed on the donor registry described in subsection (4)(b)(ii). Information about an applicant's indication of a willingness to have the applicant's name placed on the donor registry that is obtained by the secretary of state under subsection (4) and forwarded under subsection (14) is exempt from disclosure under section 13(1)(d) of the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.243. The secretary of state is not required to maintain a record of an individual who does not indicate a willingness to have the individual's name placed on the donor registry described in subsection (4)(b)(ii) or an individual who does not respond to an inquiry under subsection (4)(a). (7) If an application is received from an individual previously licensed in another jurisdiction, the secretary of state shall request a copy of the applicant's driving record and other available information from the National Driver Register. When received, the driving record and other available information become a part of the driver's record in this state. (8) If an individual applies for a commercial learner's permit for an original vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement to operate a commercial motor vehicle, the secretary of state may verify the individual's identity, may require proof of Michigan domicile under 49 CFR 383.5, and may verify the individual's proof of United States citizenship or proof of lawful 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 permanent residency as required under 49 CFR 383.71 and 383.73, if that information is not on the individual's Michigan driving record. If an individual applies for a renewal of an operator's or chauffeur's license to operate a commercial motor vehicle, the secretary of state may verify the individual's identity, may require proof of Michigan domicile under 49 CFR 383.5, and may verify the individual's proof of citizenship or lawful permanent residency under 49 CFR 383.71 and 383.73, if that information is not on the individual's Michigan driving record. If an individual applies for an upgrade of a vehicle group designation or indorsement, endorsement, the secretary of state may verify the individual's identity, may require proof of Michigan domicile under 49 CFR 383.5, and may verify the individual's proof of citizenship or lawful permanent residency under 49 CFR 383.71 and 383.73, if that information is not on the individual's Michigan driving record. The secretary of state shall request the individual's complete driving record from all states where the applicant was previously licensed to drive any type of motor vehicle over the last 10 years before issuing a vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement to the applicant. If the applicant does not hold a valid commercial motor vehicle driver license from a state where the applicant was licensed in the last 10 years, this complete driving record request must be made not earlier than 24 hours before the secretary of state issues the applicant a vehicle group designation or indorsement. endorsement. For all other drivers, this request must be made not earlier than 10 days before the secretary of state issues the applicant a vehicle group designation or indorsement. endorsement. If the application is for the renewal of a vehicle group designation or indorsement, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 endorsement, and if the secretary of state enters on the individual's driving record maintained under section 204a a notation that the request was made and the date of the request, the secretary of state is required to request the applicant's complete driving record from other states only once under this section. The secretary of state shall also check the applicant's driving record with the National Driver Register and the federal Commercial Driver's License Information System before issuing that group designation or indorsement.endorsement. (9) The secretary of state may issue a renewal operator's or chauffeur's license or renewal mobile operator's or chauffeur's license for 1 additional 4-year period or beginning on July 1, 2021, for 2 additional 4-year periods, or until the individual is no longer determined to be legally present under this section by mail or by other methods prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state may check the applicant's driving record through the National Driver Register and the Commercial Driver's License Information System before issuing a license under this section. The secretary of state shall issue a renewal license only in person if the individual is an individual required under section 5a of the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.725a, to maintain a valid operator's or chauffeur's license or official state personal identification card. If a license is renewed by mail or by other method, the secretary of state shall issue evidence of renewal to indicate the date the license expires in the future. The department of state police shall provide to the secretary of state updated lists of individuals required under section 5a of the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.725a, to maintain a valid operator's or chauffeur's license or official state personal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 identification card. (10) Upon On request, the secretary of state shall provide an information manual to an applicant explaining how to obtain a vehicle group designation or indorsement. endorsement. The manual must contain the information required under 49 CFR part 383. (11) The secretary of state shall not disclose a Social Security number obtained under subsection (1) to another person except for use for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Compliance with 49 USC 31301 to 31317 and regulations and state law and rules related to this chapter. (b) To carry out the purposes of section 466(a) of the social security act, 42 USC 666, in connection with matters relating to paternity, child support, or overdue child support. (c) To check an applicant's driving record through the National Driver Register and the Commercial Driver's License Information System when issuing a license under this act. (d) With the department of health and human services, for comparison with vital records maintained by the department of health and human services under part 28 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2801 to 333.2899. (e) As otherwise required by law. (12) The secretary of state shall not display an individual's Social Security number on the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license. (13) A requirement under this section to include a Social Security number on an application does not apply to an applicant who demonstrates that the applicant is exempt under law from obtaining a Social Security number. (14) As required in section 10120 of the public health code, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10120, the secretary of state shall maintain the donor registry in a manner that provides electronic access, including, but not limited to, the transfer of data to this state's federally designated organ procurement organization or its successor organization, tissue banks, and eye banks, in a manner that complies with that section. (15) The secretary of state, with the approval of the state administrative board created under 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.1 to 17.3, may enter into agreements with the United States government to verify whether an applicant for an operator's license or a chauffeur's license under this section who is not a citizen of the United States is authorized under federal law to be present in the United States. (16) The secretary of state shall not issue an operator's license or a chauffeur's license to an individual holding an operator's license or chauffeur's license issued by another state without confirmation that the individual is terminating or has terminated the operator's license or chauffeur's license issued by the other state. (17) The secretary of state shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure the physical security of locations where operator's licenses and chauffeur's licenses are produced and the security of document materials and papers from which operator's licenses and chauffeur's licenses are produced. (b) Subject all persons authorized to manufacture or produce operator's licenses or chauffeur's licenses and all persons who have the ability to affect the identity information that appears on operator's licenses or chauffeur's licenses to appropriate security clearance requirements. The security requirements of this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subdivision and subdivision (a) may require that licenses be manufactured or produced in this state. (c) Provide fraudulent document recognition programs to department of state employees engaged in the issuance of operator's licenses and chauffeur's licenses. (18) The secretary of state shall have electronic access to prisoner information maintained by the department of corrections for the purpose of verifying the identity of a prisoner who applies for an operator's or chauffeur's license under subsection (1). (19) Subject to this subsection, any printed notice provided to an applicant at the conclusion of a transaction conducted under this section must, if the individual's information will be used for voter registration or voter preregistration under section 493a(2) to (5) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.493a, include a notice of that use and that the individual will receive a notice mailed under section 493a(2) to (5) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.493a. If the individual's information has been used for voter registration or preregistration under section 493a(6) of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.493a, the printed notice provided to the applicant must include a notice of that voter registration and the printed notice serves as a receipt verifying the voter registration application. Sec. 310. (1) The secretary of state shall issue an operator's license to each person licensed as an operator and a chauffeur's license to each person licensed as a chauffeur. An applicant for a motorcycle indorsement endorsement under section 312a or a vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement shall first qualify for an operator's or chauffeur's license before the indorsement endorsement or vehicle group designation application is accepted 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and processed. An Except for a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, an original license or the first renewal of an existing license issued to a person who is less than 21 years of age must be portrait or vertical in form and a license issued to a person 21 years of age or over older must be landscape or horizontal in form. (2) The license issued under subsection (1) must contain all of the following: (a) The distinguishing number permanently assigned to the licensee. (b) Except as provided in section 310f, the full legal name, date of birth, address of residence, height, eye color, sex, digital photographic image, expiration date, and signature of the licensee. (c) In Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, in the case of a licensee who has indicated his or her the licensee's wish to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123, a heart insignia on the front of the physical operator's or chauffeur's license or the enhanced driver license. A mobile operator's or chauffeur's license or a mobile enhanced driver license may contain a heart insignia, code, text-based indicator, or other indicator approved by the secretary of state to indicate that the licensee wishes to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123. (d) Physical security Security features designed to prevent tampering, counterfeiting, or duplication of the license for fraudulent purposes. (e) If requested by an individual who is a veteran of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 armed forces of this state, another state, or the United States, a designation that the individual is a veteran. The designation must be in a style and format considered appropriate by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall require proof of discharge or separation of service from the armed forces of this state, another state, or the United States, and the nature of that discharge, for the purposes of verifying an individual's status as a veteran under this subdivision. The secretary of state shall consult with the department of military and veterans affairs in determining the proof that must be required to identify an individual's status as a veteran for the purposes of this subsection. The secretary of state may provide the department of military and veterans affairs and agencies of the counties of this state that provide veteran services with information provided by an applicant under this subsection for the purpose of veterans' benefits eligibility referral. (3) Except as otherwise required under this chapter, other information required on the license under this chapter may appear on the license in a form prescribed by the secretary of state. (4) The license must not contain a fingerprint or finger image of the licensee. (5) A digitized license may contain an identifier for voter registration purposes. The digitized license may contain information appearing in electronic or machine-readable codes needed to conduct a transaction with the secretary of state. The information must be limited to the information described in subsection (2)(a) and (b) except for the person's digital photographic image and signature, state of issuance, license expiration date, and other information necessary for use with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 electronic devices, machine readers, or automatic teller machines and must not contain the driving record or other personal identifier. The license must identify the encoded information. (6) The license must be manufactured in a manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to reproduce, alter, counterfeit, forge, or duplicate the license without ready detection. In addition, a license with a vehicle group designation must contain the information required under 49 CFR part 383. (7) Except as provided in subsection (11), a person who intentionally reproduces, alters, counterfeits, forges, or duplicates a license photograph, the negative of the photograph, image, license, or electronic data contained on a license or a part of a license or who uses a license, image, or photograph that has been reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated is subject to 1 of the following: (a) If the intent of the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is to commit or aid in the commission of an offense that is a felony punishable by imprisonment for 10 or more years, the person committing the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (b) If the intent of the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is to commit or aid in the commission of an offense that is a felony punishable by imprisonment for less than 10 years or a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for 6 months or more, the person committing the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment for not more 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (c) If the intent of the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is to commit or aid in the commission of an offense that is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for less than 6 months, the person committing the reproduction, alteration, counterfeiting, forging, duplication, or use is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (8) Except as provided in subsections (11) and (16), a person who sells, or who possesses with the intent to deliver to another, a reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated license photograph, negative of the photograph, image, license, or electronic data contained on a license or part of a license is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (9) Except as provided in subsections (11) and (16), a person who is in possession of 2 or more reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated license photographs, negatives of the photograph, images, licenses, or electronic data contained on a license or part of a license is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (10) Except as provided in subsection (16), a person who is in possession of a reproduced, altered, counterfeited, forged, or duplicated license photograph, negative of the photograph, image, license, or electronic data contained on a license or part of a license is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (11) Subsections (7)(a) and (b), (8), and (9) do not apply to a minor whose intent is to violate section 703 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1703. (12) The secretary of state, upon on determining after an examination that an applicant is mentally and physically qualified to receive a license, may issue the applicant a temporary driver's permit. The temporary driver's permit entitles the applicant, while having the permit in his or her the applicant's immediate possession, to operate a motor vehicle upon on the highway for a period not exceeding 60 days before the secretary of state has issued the applicant an operator's or chauffeur's license. The secretary of state may establish a longer duration for the validity of a temporary driver's permit if necessary to accommodate the process of obtaining a background check that is required for an applicant by federal law. (13) An operator or chauffeur may indicate on the license in a place designated by the secretary of state his or her the operator's or chauffeur's blood type, emergency contact information, immunization data, medication data, or a statement that the licensee is deaf. A mobile operator's or chauffeur's license may include a text-based indicator, code, or other indicator approved by the secretary of state to indicate that the licensee is deaf. The secretary of state shall not require an applicant for an original or renewal operator's or chauffeur's license to provide emergency contact information as a condition of obtaining a license. However, the secretary of state may inquire whether an operator or chauffeur would like to provide emergency contact information and, beginning July 1, 2021, shall allow an operator or chauffeur that meets the requirements of subsection 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (21) to elect a communication impediment designation. Emergency contact information obtained under this subsection must be disclosed only to a state or federal law enforcement agency for law enforcement purposes or to the extent necessary for a medical emergency. The secretary of state shall develop and shall, in conjunction with the department of state police, implement a process using the L.E.I.N. or any other appropriate system that limits access to law enforcement that would allow law enforcement agencies of this state to access emergency contact information and, beginning July 1, 2021, to view a communication impediment designation that the holder of an operator's license has voluntarily provided to the secretary of state. (14) An operator or chauffeur may indicate on the license in a place designated by the secretary of state that he or she the operator or chauffeur has designated a patient advocate in accordance with sections 5506 to 5515 of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5506 to 700.5515. (15) If the applicant provides proof to the secretary of state that he or she the applicant is a minor who has been emancipated under 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.1 to 722.6, the license must bear the designation of the individual's emancipated status in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (16) Subsections (8), (9), and (10) do not apply to a person who is in possession of 1 or more photocopies, reproductions, or duplications of a license to document the identity of the licensee for a legitimate business purpose. (17) A sticker or decal may be provided by any person, hospital, school, medical group, or association interested in assisting in implementing an emergency medical information card, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 but must meet the specifications of the secretary of state. An emergency medical information card may contain information concerning the licensee's patient advocate designation, other emergency medical information, or an indication as to where the licensee has stored or registered emergency medical information. (18) The secretary of state shall inquire of each licensee, in person or by mail, whether the licensee agrees to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123. (19) A licensee who has agreed to participate in the anatomical gift donor registry under part 101 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.10101 to 333.10123, must not be considered to have revoked that agreement solely because the licensee's license has been revoked or suspended or has expired. Enrollment in the donor registry constitutes a legal agreement that remains binding and in effect after the donor's death regardless of the expressed desires of the deceased donor's next of kin who may oppose the donor's anatomical gift. (20) If an operator's or chauffeur's license is issued to an individual described in section 307(1)(b) who has temporary lawful status, the license must be issued in compliance with 6 CFR 37.21 or in compliance with the process established to comply with 6 CFR 37.71 by the secretary of state. (21) An operator or chauffeur seeking an election for a communication impediment designation under subsection (13) shall provide to the secretary of state a certification that meets all of the following: (a) Is signed by a physician, physician assistant, certified nurse practitioner, audiologist, speech-language pathologist, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 psychologist, or physical therapist licensed to practice in this state. (b) Identifies the individual for whom the communication impediment designation is being elected. (c) Attests to the nature of the communication impediment. (22) A person who intentionally makes a false statement of material fact or commits or attempts to commit a deception or fraud on a statement described under subsection (21) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (23) Subject to subsection (24), the secretary of state may cancel or revoke a communication impediment designation elected and maintained under this section if either of the following circumstances applies: (a) The secretary of state determines that a communication impediment designation was fraudulently or erroneously elected. (b) The secretary of state determines the communication impediment designation was abused during a traffic stop. (24) The secretary of state shall provide the operator or chauffeur notice and an opportunity to be heard before canceling or revoking a communication impediment designation under subsection (23). (25) As used in this section: (a) "Communication impediment" means the operator or chauffeur has a health condition that may impede communication with a police officer during a traffic stop, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (i) Deafness or hearing loss. (ii) An autism spectrum disorder. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) "Emergency contact information" means the name, telephone number, or address of an individual that is used for the sole purpose of contacting that individual when the holder of an operator's license has been involved in an emergency. (c) "Temporary lawful status" means that term as defined in 6 CFR 37.3. (d) "Veteran" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1965 PA 190, MCL 35.61. Sec. 310a. (1) After the secretary of state develops or enters into a contract to develop the mobile license system under subsection (3), on request of an individual issued a physical operator's license or chauffeur's license under section 307(1), the secretary of state may issue a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license to the individual. The secretary of state shall ensure that any data elements in the mobile operator's or chauffeur's license match the data elements contained in the records of the department. The secretary of state shall not issue or renew a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license to an individual who does not hold a valid physical operator's license or chauffeur's license. The secretary of state may provision an individual's mobile operator's or chauffeur's license onto multiple electronic devices through the mobile license system developed under this section. An individual issued a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license under this subsection is required to have the physical operator's or chauffeur's license in the individual's immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle. (2) A requirement under this act to surrender, destroy, or confiscate a license does not apply to the electronic device on which a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, or a mobile 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 enhanced driver license, is provisioned. Notwithstanding this subsection and on request of a relying party, an individual may authorize the transmission of the requested data elements contained in the individual's mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, or a mobile enhanced driver license, from the electronic device on which a mobile license described under this subsection is provisioned. (3) Not later than 18 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the secretary of state shall develop or enter into a contract with a vendor to develop a mobile license system. The mobile license system developed under this subsection must be a digitized system that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is designed to comply with the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators' mobile driver license implementation guidelines. (b) Is designed to not require a holder of a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license or a mobile enhanced driver license to relinquish possession of the electronic device on which the mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, or a mobile enhanced driver license, is provisioned to a relying party for the acceptance of the mobile operator's or chauffeur's license. (c) Includes all of the following: (i) A method for provisioning a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, mobile official state personal identification card, mobile enhanced driver license, or mobile enhanced official state personal identification card to the electronic device of an individual that protects the data being transmitted and prevents interception and access during the provisioning process by any party other than the secretary of state or the individual. The data 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 elements must be provisioned to the electronic device of an individual to permit the presentation or use of the mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, a mobile official state personal identification card, a mobile enhanced driver license, or mobile enhanced official state personal identification card while the electronic device is offline. The data elements must be encrypted and stored securely on the device of the individual issued a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, a mobile official state personal identification card, a mobile enhanced driver license, or a mobile enhanced official state personal identification card to ensure the release of the data elements is solely controlled by that individual. (ii) A method to validate, process, and verify requests from relying parties. (iii) Cryptographic authentication, interoperability, and system updates. (iv) A method to perform tasks to maintain and update the system. (d) Protects the privacy of the holder of a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, a mobile official state personal identification card, a mobile enhanced driver license, or a mobile enhanced official state personal identification card through the following features: (i) Data minimization features that allow the individual to review all the data elements being requested by a relying party before the release of any of those data elements. (ii) Transmission protections preventing the interception and access of any data elements by any party other than the relying party or the individual involved in the transaction. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (iii) Any other data minimization and privacy-enhancing features or capabilities. (iv) A method for manually deleting locally stored transaction history. (4) The secretary of state may promulgate rules that are necessary for the management and administration of the mobile license system. (5) The secretary of state shall do both of the following: (a) Regularly update an individual's information contained in a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license. (b) Set the validity period of a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Cryptographic" means a method of storing or transmitting data in a format such that only the intended recipient can access, read, or process the data. (b) "Data elements" means a distinct component of an individual's information that is found on the records of the department. (c) "Mobile enhanced driver license" means a mobile enhanced driver license issued under section 4 of the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.304. (d) "Mobile enhanced official state personal identification card" means a mobile enhanced official state personal identification card issued under section 4 of the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.304. (e) "Mobile official state personal identification card" means 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a mobile official state personal identification card issued under section 2 of 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.292. (f) "Provision" means the loading of a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, mobile enhanced driver license, mobile enhanced official state personal identification card, or mobile official state personal identification card onto an individual's electronic device. (g) "Relying party" means that term as defined in section 3 of the relying parties on mobile licenses act. (h) "Validity period" means the duration of time that data transmitted to an electronic device remains valid, as determined by the secretary of state. Sec. 311. The licensee shall have his or her the licensee's physical operator's or chauffeur's license, or the receipt described in section 311a, in his or her the licensee's immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle, and on demand of a police officer who identifies themself as a police officer, shall display the same upon demand of any police officer, who shall identify himself or herself as such.either a physical operator's or chauffeur's license or, if the police officer is a relying party, a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license. Sec. 312. (1) Upon On proper showing of extenuating circumstances and special reasons, or need by an applicant who meets the age qualifications and when accompanied by the fee as provided in this act, the secretary of state may recommend a restricted operator's or chauffeur's license containing conditions and restrictions applicable to the licensee, the type of special mechanical control devices required in a motor vehicle operated by the licensee, and the area, time, or other condition that the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 secretary of state considers necessary to assure the safe operation of a vehicle by the licensee and under which the licensee may operate a motor vehicle. A license issued to a person an individual who is at least 14 years of age and under 16 years of age shall must contain only the conditions determining the hours during which the licensee may drive a motor vehicle and the purpose for which it is to be driven. A license issued to a minor who is at least 14 years of age and under 16 years of age shall must be revoked by the secretary of state on the written request of a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis. (2) An operator's license or a mobile operator's or chauffeur's license issued to a person an individual who is at least 14 years of age and under 16 years of age expires on the birthday following issuance of the license or if that birthday is within 6 months after the date of issuance of the license, then 1 year after the date of that birthday. (3) Upon On receiving satisfactory evidence of a violation of the restrictions of the license, the secretary of state may suspend or revoke the license. (4) A person An individual who violates a restriction imposed in a restricted license issued to that person individual is guilty of a misdemeanor. This subsection does not apply to a person an individual who is at least 14 years of age and under 16 years of age. (5) If a motor vehicle is being driven by a person an individual who is at least 14 years of age and under 16 years of age, and that person individual is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, the conditions, limitations, and restrictions set forth in this section do not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 apply. Sec. 314. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an operator's license, and a chauffeur's license, a mobile operator's license, and a mobile chauffeur's license expire on the birthday of the individual to whom the license is issued in the fourth year following the date of the issuance of the license or on the date the individual is no longer considered to be legally present in the United States under section 307, whichever is earlier, unless suspended or revoked before that date. A license must not be issued for a period longer than 4 years. An individual holding a license at any time 12 months before the expiration of his or her the individual's license may apply for a new license as provided for in this chapter. A knowledge test for an original group designation or indorsement endorsement may be taken at any time during this period and the results are valid for 12 months. A license renewed under this subsection must be renewed for the time remaining on the license before its renewal combined with the 4-year renewal period. (2) The first operator's license or mobile operator's license issued to an individual who at the time of application is less than 20-1/2 years of age expires on the licensee's twenty-first birthday or on the date the individual is no longer considered to be legally present in the United States under section 307, whichever is earlier, unless suspended or revoked. (3) The first chauffeur's license or mobile chauffeur's license issued to an individual expires on the licensee's birthday in the fourth year following the date of issuance or on the date the individual is no longer considered to be legally present in the United States under section 307, whichever is earlier, unless the license is suspended or revoked before that date. The chauffeur's 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 license or mobile chauffeur's license of an individual who at the time of application is less than 20-1/2 years of age expires on the licensee's twenty-first birthday or on the date the individual is no longer considered to be legally present in the United States under section 307, whichever is earlier, unless suspended or revoked. A subsequent chauffeur's license or mobile chauffeur's license expires on the birthday of the individual to whom the license is issued in the fourth year following the date of issuance of the license or on the date the individual is no longer considered to be legally present in the United States under section 307, whichever is earlier, unless the license is suspended or revoked before that date. (4) An individual may apply for an extension of his or her the individual's driving privileges if he or she the individual is out of state on the date that his or her the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license or mobile operator's or chauffeur's license expires. The extension may extend the license for 180 days beyond the expiration date or not more than 2 weeks after the applicant returns to Michigan, this state, whichever occurs first. This subsection does not apply to an individual who fails to meet the requirements of 49 CFR parts 383 and 391 with regard to medical certification documentation requirements. (5) The secretary of state may issue a renewal operator's or chauffeur's license or mobile operator's or chauffeur's license to an individual who will be out of state for more than 180 days beyond the expiration date of his or her the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license or mobile operator's or chauffeur's license, if the secretary of state has a digital image of the individual on file. The applicant for this renewal shall 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 submit a statement evidencing a vision examination in accordance with the rules promulgated by the secretary of state under section 309 and any other statement required by this act or federal law. An individual is not eligible for consecutive renewals of a license under this subsection. This subsection does not apply to an individual who fails to meet the requirements of 49 CFR parts 383 and 391 with regard to medical certification documentation requirements, or an individual with a hazardous material endorsement on his or her operator's or chauffeur's the individual's license. (6) The secretary of state may check the applicant's driving record through the National Driver Register and the Commercial Driver's License Information System before issuing a renewal under this section. (7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an operator's or chauffeur's license that expires on or after March 1, 2020 is valid until March 31, 2021. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an operator's or chauffeur's license that expires after March 31, 2021 but before August 1, 2021 is valid until 120 days after the date of the expiration. Sec. 811c. (1) The fee for an original or renewal mobile operator's or chauffeur's license must not be more than $4.00. The secretary of state shall deposit the money received and collected under this subsection in the fund created under subsection (2). (2) The mobile license fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. The secretary of state is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. The secretary of state shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, to cover necessary administrative and implementation costs incurred in providing mobile operator's or chauffeur's licenses, mobile official state personal identification cards, or mobile enhanced driver licenses or mobile enhanced official state personal identification cards. Sec. 901a. If a person an individual has received a citation for a violation of section 311, the court shall waive any fine and costs, upon on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that the person, individual, before the appearance date on the citation, has produced his or her the individual's physical operator's or chauffeur's license and that the license was valid on the date the violation of section 311 occurred. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04150'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04150'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04151'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04151'25). (c) Senate Bill No. 620.